Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1363
Agricultural and horticultural land; classes and subclasses.

Agricultural land and horticultural land shall be divided into classes and subclasses of real property under section 77-103.01, including, but not limited to, irrigated cropland, dryland cropland, grassland, wasteland, nurseries, feedlots, and orchards, so that the categories reflect uses appropriate for the valuation of such land according to law. Classes shall be inventoried by subclasses of real property based on soil classification standards developed by the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture as converted into land capability groups by the Property Tax Administrator. Land capability groups shall be Natural Resources Conservation Service specific to the applied use and not all based on a dryland farming criterion. County assessors shall utilize soil surveys from the Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States Department of Agriculture as directed by the Property Tax Administrator. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the classes and subclasses of real property that may be used by county assessors or the Tax Equalization and Review Commission to achieve more uniform and proportionate valuations.

Laws 1985, LB 271, § 8;

Laws 1988, LB 1207, § 5;

Laws 1989, LB 361, § 17;

Laws 1991, LB 320, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 902, § 19;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 139;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 81;

Laws 1999, LB 403, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 170, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 30;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 36;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 31;

Laws 2010, LB877, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB372, § 1.

A "market area" does not constitute a class or subclass of agricultural land as defined by this section. Bartlett v. Dawes Cty. Bd. of Equal., 259 Neb. 954, 613 N.W.2d 810 (2000).

Neb. Const. art. VIII requires uniform and proportionate assessment within the class of agricultural land; agricultural land is then divided into "categories" such as irrigated cropland, dry cropland, and grassland. Schmidt v. Thayer Cty. Bd. of Equal., 10 Neb. App. 10, 624 N.W.2d 63 (2001).